Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 9
STATE COUNCIL ON THE ARTS

23-9-101 to 23-9-107. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article repealed, p. 1659, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as §§ 3-18-9 through 3-18-16 in C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2006, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this article were relocated to article 48.8 of title 24. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following those sections that were relocated to article 48.8.